Washington statutes.
RCW 19.184.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Collateral costs" means expenses incurred by a consumer in connection with the repair of a nonconformity, including the costs of obtaining an alternative wheelchair or other device assisting mobility.

(2) "Consumer" means any of the following:

(a) The purchaser of a wheelchair, if the wheelchair was purchased from a wheelchair dealer or manufacturer for purposes other than resale;

(b) A person to whom a wheelchair is transferred for purposes other than resale, if the transfer occurs before the expiration of an express warranty applicable to the wheelchair;

(c) A person who may enforce a warranty on a wheelchair; or

(d) A person who leases a wheelchair from a wheelchair lessor under a written lease.

(3) "Demonstrator" means a wheelchair used primarily for the purpose of demonstration to the public.

(4) "Early termination cost" means an expense or obligation that a wheelchair lessor incurs as a result of both the termination of a written lease before the termination date set forth in the lease and the return of a wheelchair to a manufacturer under RCW 19.184.030(2)(b). "Early termination cost" includes a penalty for prepayment under a finance arrangement.

(5) "Early termination savings" means an expense or obligation that a wheelchair lessor avoids as a result of both the termination of a written lease before the termination date set forth in the lease and the return of a wheelchair to a manufacturer under RCW 19.184.030(2)(b). "Early termination savings" includes an interest charge that the wheelchair lessor would have paid to finance the wheelchair or, if the wheelchair lessor does not finance the wheelchair, the difference between the total amount for which the lease obligates the consumer during the period of the lease term remaining after the early termination and the present value of that amount at the date of the early termination.

(6) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures or assembles wheelchairs and agents of the person, including an importer, a distributor, factory branch, distributor branch, and a warrantor of the manufacturer's wheelchairs, but does not include a wheelchair dealer.

(7) "Nonconformity" means a condition or defect that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of a wheelchair, and that is covered by an express warranty applicable to the wheelchair or to a component of the wheelchair, but does not include a condition or defect that is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modification or alteration of the wheelchair by a consumer.

(8) "Reasonable attempt to repair" means any of the following occurring within the term of an express warranty applicable to a new wheelchair or within one year after first delivery of a wheelchair to a consumer, whichever is sooner:

(a) An attempted repair by the manufacturer, wheelchair lessor, or the manufacturer's authorized dealer is made to the same warranty nonconformity at least four times and the nonconformity continues; or

(b) The wheelchair is out of service for an aggregate of at least thirty days because of warranty nonconformity.

(9) "Wheelchair" means a wheelchair, including a demonstrator, that a consumer purchases or accepts transfer of in this state.

(10) "Wheelchair dealer" means a person who is in the business of selling wheelchairs.

(11) "Wheelchair lessor" means a person who leases a wheelchair to a consumer, or who holds the lessor's rights, under a written lease.

[ 1995 c 14 s 1; 1994 c 104 s 1.]